src/app/lib/typo_js/tests/dictionaries/la/la.aff
SET ISO8859-1
TRY esianrtolcdugmphbyfvkw
SFX a Y 124
SFX a a a a 
SFX a a ae a 
SFX a a am a 
SFX a a as a 
SFX a a arum a 
SFX a a is a 
SFX a 0 que a 
SFX a 0 ne a 
SFX a 0 ve a 
SFX a a aeque a 
SFX a a aene a 
SFX a a aeve a 
SFX a a amque a 
SFX a a amne a 
SFX a a amve a 
SFX a a asque a 
SFX a a asne a 
SFX a a asve a 
SFX a a arumque a 
SFX a a arumne a 
SFX a a arumve a 
SFX a a isque a 
SFX a a isne a 
SFX a a isve a 
SFX a ae ae ae 
SFX a ae am ae 
SFX a ae as ae 
SFX a ae arum ae 
SFX a ae is ae 
SFX a ae aeque ae 
SFX a ae aene ae 
SFX a ae aeve ae 
SFX a ae amque ae 
SFX a ae amne ae 
SFX a ae amve ae 
SFX a ae asque ae 
SFX a ae asne ae 
SFX a ae asve ae 
SFX a ae arumque ae 
SFX a ae arumne ae 
SFX a ae arumve ae 
SFX a ae isque ae 
SFX a ae isne ae 
SFX a ae isve ae 
SFX a i i i 
SFX a i a i 
SFX a i am i 
SFX a i ae i 
SFX a i as i 
SFX a i arum i 
SFX a 0 que i 
SFX a 0 ne i 
SFX a 0 ve i 
SFX a i aque i 
SFX a i ane i 
SFX a i ave i 
SFX a i amque i 
SFX a i amne i 
SFX a i amve i 
SFX a i aeque i 
SFX a i aene i 
SFX a i aeve i 
SFX a i asque i 
SFX a i asne i 
SFX a i asve i 
SFX a i arumque i 
SFX a i arumne i 
SFX a i arumve i 
SFX a us us us 
SFX a us a us 
SFX a us am us 
SFX a us ae us 
SFX a us as us 
SFX a us arum us 
SFX a us is us 
SFX a 0 que us 
SFX a 0 ne us 
SFX a 0 ve us 
SFX a us aque us 
SFX a us ane us 
SFX a us ave us 
SFX a us amque us 
SFX a us amne us 
SFX a us amve us 
SFX a us aeque us 
SFX a us aene us 
SFX a us aeve us 
SFX a us asque us 
SFX a us asne us 
SFX a us asve us 
SFX a us arumque us 
SFX a us arumne us 
SFX a us arumve us 
SFX a us isque us 
SFX a us isne us 
SFX a us isve us 
SFX a r r r 
SFX a 0 a r 
SFX a 0 am r 
SFX a 0 ae r 
SFX a 0 as r 
SFX a 0 arum r 
SFX a 0 is r 
SFX a 0 que r 
SFX a 0 ne r 
SFX a 0 ve r 
SFX a 0 aque r 
SFX a 0 ane r 
SFX a 0 ave r 
SFX a 0 amque r 
SFX a 0 amne r 
SFX a 0 amve r 
SFX a 0 aeque r 
SFX a 0 aene r 
SFX a 0 aeve r 
SFX a 0 asque r 
SFX a 0 asne r 
SFX a 0 asve r 
SFX a 0 arumque r 
SFX a 0 arumne r 
SFX a 0 arumve r 
SFX a 0 isque r 
SFX a 0 isne r 
SFX a 0 isve r 
SFX b Y 84
SFX b us us us 
SFX b us e us 
SFX b us um us 
SFX b us i us 
SFX b us o us 
SFX b us os us 
SFX b us orum us 
SFX b us is us 
SFX b 0 que us 
SFX b 0 ne us 
SFX b 0 ve us 
SFX b us eque us 
SFX b us ene us 
SFX b us eve us 
SFX b us umque us 
SFX b us umne us 
SFX b us umve us 
SFX b us ique us 
SFX b us ine us 
SFX b us ive us 
SFX b us oque us 
SFX b us one us 
SFX b us ove us 
SFX b us osque us 
SFX b us osne us 
SFX b us osve us 
SFX b us orumque us 
SFX b us orumne us 
SFX b us orumve us 
SFX b us isque us 
SFX b us isne us 
SFX b us isve us 
SFX b i i i 
SFX b i um i 
SFX b i o i 
SFX b i os i 
SFX b i orum i 
SFX b i is i 
SFX b 0 que i 
SFX b 0 ne i 
SFX b 0 ve i 
SFX b i umque i 
SFX b i umne i 
SFX b i umve i 
SFX b i oque i 
SFX b i one i 
SFX b i ove i 
SFX b i osque i 
SFX b i osne i 
SFX b i osve i 
SFX b i orumque i 
SFX b i orumne i 
SFX b i orumve i 
SFX b i isque i 
SFX b i isne i 
SFX b i isve i 
SFX b r r r 
SFX b 0 um r 
SFX b 0 i r 
SFX b 0 o r 
SFX b 0 os r 
SFX b 0 orum r 
SFX b 0 is r 
SFX b 0 que r 
SFX b 0 ne r 
SFX b 0 ve r 
SFX b 0 umque r 
SFX b 0 umne r 
SFX b 0 umve r 
SFX b 0 ique r 
SFX b 0 ine r 
SFX b 0 ive r 
SFX b 0 oque r 
SFX b 0 one r 
SFX b 0 ove r 
SFX b 0 osque r 
SFX b 0 osne r 
SFX b 0 osve r 
SFX b 0 orumque r 
SFX b 0 orumne r 
SFX b 0 orumve r 
SFX b 0 isque r 
SFX b 0 isne r 
SFX b 0 isve r 
SFX c Y 76
SFX c um um um 
SFX c um i um 
SFX c um o um 
SFX c um a um 
SFX c um orum um 
SFX c um is um 
SFX c 0 que um 
SFX c 0 ne um 
SFX c 0 ve um 
SFX c um ique um 
SFX c um ine um 
SFX c um ive um 
SFX c um oque um 
SFX c um one um 
SFX c um ove um 
SFX c um aque um 
SFX c um ane um 
SFX c um ave um 
SFX c um orumque um 
SFX c um orumne um 
SFX c um orumve um 
SFX c um isque um 
SFX c um isne um 
SFX c um isve um 
SFX c us us us 
SFX c us i us 
SFX c us o us 
SFX c us a us 
SFX c us orum us 
SFX c us is us 
SFX c us um us 
SFX c 0 que us 
SFX c 0 ne us 
SFX c 0 ve us 
SFX c us ique us 
SFX c us ine us 
SFX c us ive us 
SFX c us oque us 
SFX c us one us 
SFX c us ove us 
SFX c us aque us 
SFX c us ane us 
SFX c us ave us 
SFX c us orumque us 
SFX c us orumne us 
SFX c us orumve us 
SFX c us isque us 
SFX c us isne us 
SFX c us isve us 
SFX c us umque us 
SFX c us umne us 
SFX c us umve us 
SFX c i i i 
SFX c i o i 
SFX c i a i 
SFX c i orum i 
SFX c i is i 
SFX c i um i 
SFX c 0 que i 
SFX c 0 ne i 
SFX c 0 ve i 
SFX c i oque i 
SFX c i one i 
SFX c i ove i 
SFX c i aque i 
SFX c i ane i 
SFX c i ave i 
SFX c i orumque i 
SFX c i orumne i 
SFX c i orumve i 
SFX c i isque i 
SFX c i isne i 
SFX c i isve i 
SFX c i umque i 
SFX c i umne i 
SFX c i umve i 
SFX d Y 71
SFX d is is is 
SFX d is em is 
SFX d is i is 
SFX d is e is 
SFX d is es is 
SFX d is ibus is 
SFX d 0 que is 
SFX d 0 ne is 
SFX d 0 ve is 
SFX d is emque is 
SFX d is emne is 
SFX d is emve is 
SFX d is ique is 
SFX d is ine is 
SFX d is ive is 
SFX d is eque is 
SFX d is ene is 
SFX d is eve is 
SFX d is esque is 
SFX d is esne is 
SFX d is esve is 
SFX d is ibusque is 
SFX d is ibusne is 
SFX d is ibusve is 
SFX d is ium [^aeiouy][^aeiouy]is # ars, artis, f.
SFX d is um [aeiouy][^aeiouy]is # quantitas, quantitatis, f.
SFX d is um [^aeiouy][aeiouy]is 
SFX d is um [aeiouy][aeiouy]is 
SFX d is iumque [^aeiouy][^aeiouy]is 
SFX d is iumne [^aeiouy][^aeiouy]is 
SFX d is iumve [^aeiouy][^aeiouy]is 
SFX d is umque [aeiouy][^aeiouy]is 
SFX d is umne [aeiouy][^aeiouy]is 
SFX d is umve [aeiouy][^aeiouy]is 
SFX d is umque [^aeiouy][aeiouy]is 
SFX d is umne [^aeiouy][aeiouy]is 
SFX d is umve [^aeiouy][aeiouy]is 
SFX d is umque [aeiouy][aeiouy]is 
SFX d is umne [aeiouy][aeiouy]is 
SFX d is umve [aeiouy][aeiouy]is 
SFX d 0 em [^i][^s] 
SFX d 0 is [^i][^s] 
SFX d 0 i [^i][^s] 
SFX d 0 e [^i][^s] 
SFX d 0 es [^i][^s] 
SFX d 0 um [^i][^s] 
SFX d 0 ibus [^i][^s] 
SFX d 0 que [^i][^s] 
SFX d 0 ne [^i][^s] 
SFX d 0 ve [^i][^s] 
SFX d 0 emque [^i][^s] 
SFX d 0 emne [^i][^s] 
SFX d 0 emve [^i][^s] 
SFX d 0 isque [^i][^s] 
SFX d 0 isne [^i][^s] 
SFX d 0 isve [^i][^s] 
SFX d 0 ique [^i][^s] 
SFX d 0 ine [^i][^s] 
SFX d 0 ive [^i][^s] 
SFX d 0 eque [^i][^s] 
SFX d 0 ene [^i][^s] 
SFX d 0 eve [^i][^s] 
SFX d 0 esque [^i][^s] 
SFX d 0 esne [^i][^s] 
SFX d 0 esve [^i][^s] 
SFX d 0 umque [^i][^s] 
SFX d 0 umne [^i][^s] 
SFX d 0 umve [^i][^s] 
SFX d 0 ibusque [^i][^s] 
SFX d 0 ibusne [^i][^s] 
SFX d 0 ibusve [^i][^s] 
SFX e Y 36
SFX e is is is 
SFX e is i is 
SFX e is e is 
SFX e is a is 
SFX e is ibus is 
SFX e 0 que is 
SFX e 0 ne is 
SFX e 0 ve is 
SFX e is ique is 
SFX e is ine is 
SFX e is ive is 
SFX e is eque is 
SFX e is ene is 
SFX e is eve is 
SFX e is aque is 
SFX e is ane is 
SFX e is ave is 
SFX e is ibusque is 
SFX e is ibusne is 
SFX e is ibusve is 
SFX e is ium [^aeiouy][^aeiouy]is # os, ossis, n.
SFX e is um [aeiouy][^aeiouy]is # corpus, corporis, n.
SFX e is um [^aeiouy][aeiouy]is 
SFX e is um [aeiouy][aeiouy]is 
SFX e is iumque [^aeiouy][^aeiouy]is 
SFX e is iumne [^aeiouy][^aeiouy]is 
SFX e is iumve [^aeiouy][^aeiouy]is 
SFX e is umque [aeiouy][^aeiouy]is 
SFX e is umne [aeiouy][^aeiouy]is 
SFX e is umve [aeiouy][^aeiouy]is 
SFX e is umque [^aeiouy][aeiouy]is 
SFX e is umne [^aeiouy][aeiouy]is 
SFX e is umve [^aeiouy][aeiouy]is 
SFX e is umque [aeiouy][aeiouy]is 
SFX e is umne [aeiouy][aeiouy]is 
SFX e is umve [aeiouy][aeiouy]is 
SFX f Y 28
SFX f is is is 
SFX f is em is 
SFX f is i is 
SFX f is e is 
SFX f is es is 
SFX f is ium is 
SFX f is ibus is 
SFX f 0 que is 
SFX f 0 ne is 
SFX f 0 ve is 
SFX f is emque is 
SFX f is emne is 
SFX f is emve is 
SFX f is ique is 
SFX f is ine is 
SFX f is ive is 
SFX f is eque is 
SFX f is ene is 
SFX f is eve is 
SFX f is esque is 
SFX f is esne is 
SFX f is esve is 
SFX f is iumque is 
SFX f is iumne is 
SFX f is iumve is 
SFX f is ibusque is 
SFX f is ibusne is 
SFX f is ibusve is 
