src/app/lib/typo_js/tests/dictionaries/la/la.dic
actionis/d
admirabilis/fgrs
adunationis/d
adytum/c
Aegyptus/b
aeneus/abc
aequedistantis/fgt
aestimationis/d
afferendus/abc
afferentis/fg
agricola/a
Albategnius/b
alboris/d
altus/abcrs
aluminis/e
alvus/b
amatorius/abc
Amphionis/d
ancipitis/fg
animalis/de
annus/b
annuus/abc
apertus/abcrs
apicis/d
aprilis/f
aquilonis/d
Arabia/a
arabis/de
arbitrarius/abc
argumentum/c
aridus/abc
Aristotelis/d
artificis/de
assumptus/abc
auferentis/fg
augmentum/c
aura/a
authoris/d
autumnus/b
avis/f
bifarius/abc
bilancis/de
bimedialis/fg
bisextilis/fg
bonus/abc
brumalis/fg
cacuminis/e
caementum/c
Caesareus/abc
Caesaris/d
callis/f
caloris/d
cancri/b
capacis/fgs
carbonis/d
carminis/e
cauda/a
celeris/der
celonis/d
centenarius/abc
centralis/fg
ceterus/abc
chorea/a
circulationis/d
circumscriptus/abc
citimus/abc
civis/f
clarus/abcrs
climatis/e
coacervationis/d
cogitationis/d
cognominis/e
colligentia/a
coloratus/abcrs
commatis/e
commendatus/abcrs
commensurabilitatis/d
comparationis/f
compotationis/d
concavus/abcr
concentricus/abc
conferendus/abc
conformitatis/d
Cononis/d
consequentis/fg
consisus/abcrs
constructus/abc
consul/d
contrapositus/abc
convenientia/a
coronarius/abc
corporis/e
correctionis/d
cosmicus/abc
crassus/abcrs
cruris/e
cunctus/abc
curvatus/abcr
curvus/abc
cutis/f
decoris/e
decuplus/abc
deferendus/abc
deformitatis/d
delebilis/fg
delicatus/abcrs
devotus/abc
dialecticus/abc
dialogus/b
difficultatis/d
diligentis/fgs
discriminis/e
dispositus/abc
dissimillimus/abc
distinctionis/d
divitis/de
dodecuplus/abc
dominium/c
duplicationis/d
duplus/abc
ecclesiasticus/abc
eclipsis/f
Epicurus/b
epigrammatis/e
erectus/abcr
erroris/d
eruditus/abcrs
examinis/e
excellentis/fg
exemplaris/e
exercitionis/e
exiguus/abcrs
expeditus/abcr
expertis/de
extremitatis/d
factus/abch
falcis/de
familiaris/fg
fastigium/c
femoris/e
festuca/a
filaminis/e
flaminis/e
flavus/abc
flexibilis/fgr
fluxus/abch
foraminis/e
fortuitus/abc
fractionis/d
fulgetrum/c
fulguris/e
fulminis/e
funiculus/b
futilis/fg
gemmatis/e
genealogia/a
globosus/abc
glutinis/e
gortynius/abc
gratus/abcrs
Guidonis/d
heptagonus/abc
hexachordus/abc
hiemalis/fg
humerus/b
hyperdorius/abc
hyperphrygius/abc
iaspidis/d
icosahedrus/b
immanis/fgr
immediatus/abc
inaccessus/abc
inaequalis/fgt
incognitus/abc
incommoditatis/d
increatus/abc
incredibilis/fg
inexplicabilis/fg
infimus/abc
ingenium/c
inquietis/de
inseparabilis/fg
inspissatus/abc
integrationis/d
intempestus/abc
intensus/abcrs
Iove/Iemoqv
iracundus/abc
isoscelis/f
itineris/e
iucunditatis/d
iuris/e
kathetus/b
laboriosus/abc
labrum/c
lateris/e
lemmatis/e
lenticularis/fg
lesbius/abc
libertatis/d
libramentum/c
litterula/a
ludibrium/c
magnitudinis/d
malus/abc
materia/a
medialis/fg
mellis/e
membrum/c
meus/abc
militaris/fg
ministra/a
monadis/d
mortalis/fg
mortariolum/c
murmuris/e
mutus/abc
natalitius/abc
navigationis/d
navis/f
nonagincuplus/abc
nostratis/de
noxius/abc
obliquationis/d
octavus/abc
offerentis/fg
omnifarius/abc
onustus/abc
operis/e
oppositionis/d
ornamentum/c
ovalis/fg
parcus/abcrs
partitus/Sabc
pauperis/de
peculiaris/fgrst
pedis/d
perferendus/abc
permultus/abc
perspicuus/abcrs
pertinacis/fgt
plerus/abc
plinianus/abc
pluralitatis/d
pluris/e
Polybius/b
potentialis/fgt
praeteriturus/abc
praevius/abc
principis/de
problematis/e
proconsul/d
prodigiosus/abc
proferentis/fg
punctum/c
purpureus/abc
putrefactionis/d
quaesitus/abc
quincuplicis/fg
quotuplus/abc
quotus/abc
rationis/d
Regimontius/b
remissionis/d
rhetoris/e
rhomboidis/f
rorationis/d
rostrum/c
rota/a
sacomatis/e
salsus/abc
scalaris/fg
sectoris/d
secundarius/abc
sedecimus/abc
senis/deq
septentrionalis/fg
septingentesimus/abc
sexcuplus/abc
solertis/de
solidus/abc
solstitialis/fg
speciminis/e
speculum/c
stabilis/fg
stella/a
sulphuris/e
superationis/d
supernus/abc
superparticularis/fg
superus/abc
supremus/abc
temporis/e
tessellatum/c
tetradis/d
tetragonismus/b
Thamyris/f
thebanus/abc
theorematis/e
tremebundus/abc
trepidationis/d
trigonicus/abc
triplicis/fgt
trutina/a
universalis/fgrt
validus/abcrs
velocis/fgrst
Veneris/d
vestri/abc
veteris/der
visualis/fg
vocis/d
voluminis/e
